Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1211] COLORECTAL CANCER AWARENESS SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue colorectal cancer awareness special license plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays a fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5, for each set of plates, along with any other fees required by this chapter; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) contributes a minimum of $30 annually to the Minnesota colorectal cancer awareness account; and new text end new text begin (5) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin The commissioner, in consultation with the Colon Cancer Coalition, must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the phrase "Colorectal Cancer Awareness" and emphasizes the importance of early detection and screening for preventing and treating colorectal cancer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plate; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (4), must be deposited in the Minnesota colorectal cancer awareness account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner of public safety. This appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account funds, and the remaining funds are for distribution to the Colon Cancer Coalition to promote awareness of colorectal cancer and provide education on the importance of screening for prevention and treatment of the disease. By August 15 of each year, the commissioner must distribute all funds remaining in the account to the Colon Cancer Coalition. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for colorectal cancer awareness special plates issued on or after that date. new text end